Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-416
Current state publications; furnish.

Upon request by the Nebraska Publications Clearinghouse, records officers of state agencies shall furnish the clearinghouse with a complete list of their current state publications.

Laws 1972, LB 1284, § 6.